apertium-sme-smj.smj.twol
!        Vow: s                 _ ( [ j|k|m|n|t ] ) Vow:0 (%>:) (»:) X9: ; !first part of compounds
!        Vow: s                 _ j [ k|m|v ]       Vow:0 (%>:) (»:) X9: ; !first part of compounds
!        Vow: [ b|j|l|m|n|r|v ] _ s                 Vow:0 (%>:) (»:) X9: ; !first part of compounds
!        Vow: [ r|l|m ]         _ s j               Vow:0 (%>:) (»:) X9: ; !first part of compounds
!        Vow: [ r|l|n ]         _ s k               Vow:0 (%>:) (»:) X9: ; !first part of compounds
!        Vow: [ j|m|n|v ]       _ s t               Vow:0 (%>:) (»:) X9: ; !first part of compounds
!        Vow: r s               _ j t               Vow:0 (%>:) (»:) X9: ; ! No real consonant gradation, rather consonant reduction in compounds (X9)
!        Vow: h:0 t:s           _                   Vow:0 (%>:) (»:) X9: ; ! No real consonant gradation, rather consonant reduction in compounds (X9)

"Consonant gradation ŋ:0"
Cx:0 <=> Vow:             _ Cy ( [ g|k ] ) Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S7-3, S8 II-I
         Vow: [ j|l|r|v ] _ Cy          Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9
         Vow:          Cy _ k t         Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
	where Cx in ( ń ŋ ñ )
		  Cy in ( ń ŋ ñ )
    matched ;



"Consonant gradation f:0"
f:0 <=> Vow: ( [r|l] ) _ f Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S8 ff:f, S9 rff:rf
        Vow:         f _ t Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S8 ff:f, S9 rff:rf


"Consonant gradation r:0"
r:0 <=> Vow: ( [ b|j|v ] ) _ r Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S8 rr:r, S9 brr etc.

"Consonant gradation v:0"
v:0 <=> Vow: ( [ j|l|r ] ) _ v Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S8 , S9 jvv etc.

"Consonant gradation j:0"
j:0 <=> Vow: [b|r] _ j Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9

"Consonant gradation t:0"
t:0 <=> Vow: [j|ñ|ń|ŋ|r|v] _ t             Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;             ! S9 jtt:jt etc.
    	Vow: [b|j|r|v]     _ t j           Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;           ! S9
      	Vow: [b|j|v|r]     _ t s           Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;           ! S9
    	Vow:       h:      _ t ( [ j|s ] ) Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S4 htt(j)
        Vow:       t:s     _ j (%>:) (»:) (Hyph) [ # | #: ] ;                                 ! Word final weakening of -ttj to -sj
        Vow (%>:) (»:) (Dummy:) s     _ (%>:) (»:) (Hyph) [ # | #: ]  ;                           ! W-Final Cl. Simpl. málestit : máles
        Vow:       h:      _ t ( [ j|s ] ) Vow: (%>:) (»:) X6: ;               ! III-I special gradation
                                                  ! Second last rule will fail if and when clitics are added to the word.
                                                  ! Note that there is no weak grade clitic here.

!"Gradation Series 4, II-I, h Loss 1"
!€ oajváladtj#
!€ oajvála0sj0

!h:0 <=> Vow: _ [ k: | p: | t: ] Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
!        Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ; ! Deleting Final Cns in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables

"Gradation Series 4, II-I, tj and ts"
 h:0 <=> Vow: _ [ k: | p: | t: ] Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
         Vow: _ t [j|s] Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
         Vow: _ t: t: ( [ j|s ] ) Vow: (%>:) (»:) X6: ; ! III-I special gradation
         Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ; ! Deleting Final Cns in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables
! (t:) for III-I CG)

!"Word final double consonant simplification"
!Cy:0 <=> Vow: Cx: _ (%>:) (»:) (Hyph) #: ;
!     where Cx in ( s )
!	   Cy in ( s )
!	   matched ;
! Moved to the CG chapter. But does this rule wait for more cases?



! Change rules
! - - - - - -


"Gradation Series 4, II-I"
 Cx:Cy <=> Vow: h:0 _ Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
 where Cx in ( k p t )
       Cy in ( g b d )
       matched ;

!"Gradation Series 5, III-II, dtj, dts"
! d:t <=> Vow: (»:) _ t Cx Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
! where Cx in ( j s ) ;

"bb:pp"
b:p <=> Vow:    _ b:  Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
        Vow: b: _     Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
!       Vow:    _ (%>:) (»:) (Hyph) #:0 ;  ! This gives Jakob:Jakop, and it is unclear what it gives.
! The last rule is for unnep : unnebu. It must be revised in two ways:
! a. it should be extended to more consonants
! b. it should be restricted, perhaps b should be replaced with b8

!€ oabbáQ1
!€ oappá0

"gg:kk"
g:k <=> Vow:    _ g: Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
  	    Vow: g: _ Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;

!€ vággeQ1
!€ vákke0

!$ vággeQ1
!$ vágge0

!€ vággeX9
!€ vák000

!$ vággeX9
!$ vág000

"g:k change for clitic -ge"
g:k => Vow: (%>:) (»:) (Dummy:) [ # | #: ] _ e: [ # | #: ] ; !clitic ge:k

"dd:tt and dtj, dts"
d:t <=> Vow: _ d: Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
	Vow: d: _  Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
	Vow: (»:) _ t [ j|s ] (%>:) (»:) Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;


!"Gradation Series 6, III-II, bb, gg 1"
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: _ Cz: Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
! where Cx in ( b d g )
!       Cy in ( p t k )
!       Cz in ( b d g )
!       matched ;

!"Gradation Series 6, III-II, bb, gg 2"
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: :Cy _ Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
! where Cx in ( b d g )
!       Cy in ( p t k )
!       matched ;

"Gradation Series 7, III-II, ks(t), kt, ktj, kts"
 k:v <=> Vow: _ [ s|t ] (t) Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
	 Vow: _ t [ j|s ] Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;

! Exceptional II-III inverse gradation in present participles
! -----------------------------------------------------------

! This gradation is only for II-I syllable verbs that get III as
! present participles.

! Candidates:
!! bbm - bm - m
!! ddn - dn - n
!! ddnj- dnj- nj
!! ggŋ - gŋ - ŋ
!! ddj - dj - dj

!! hkk - hk - g
!! hpp - hp - b

!! htt - ht - d
!! httj- htj- tj
!! htts- hts- ts

! Strategy: Do insertion rule for the initial element.

"Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with bm,gŋ"
 0:Cx <=> :Vow+ _ Cx Cy Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ;
      where Cx in ( b g )
            Cy in ( m ŋ )
	    matched ;

"Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with dn/j"
 0:d <=> :Vow+ _ d [ n | n j | j ] Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ;

"Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with hk, hp,"
 0:Cx <=> :Vow+ h _ Cx Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ;
      where Cx in ( k p ) ;

"Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with htt(j/s)"
 0:t <=> :Vow+ h _ t (j|s) Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ; !removed Q7, fixed in smj-lex

"Consonant insertion as I-III strengthening gradation with d"
 0:d <=> :Vow+ _ d Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ;



!Did more changes to the ñ issue: Replaced ñ with all three n-s also when it alternated with other letters.
!In the cases where ñ was the one to be deleted, in the context of double ñ, we made Cx / Cy variables, e.g. like !this:
